Illinois, session 104th, HB5149.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Sections 15-111, 15-301, and 15-316 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/15-111)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 15-111)7    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 104-436)8    Sec. 15-111. Wheel and axle loads and gross weights. 9    (a) No vehicle or combination of vehicles with pneumatic 10tires may be operated, unladen or with load, when the total 11weight on the road surface exceeds the following: 20,000 12pounds on a single axle; 34,000 pounds on a tandem axle with no 13axle within the tandem exceeding 20,000 pounds; 80,000 pounds 14gross weight for vehicle combinations of 5 or more axles; or a 15total weight on a group of 2 or more consecutive axles in 16excess of that weight produced by the application of the 17following formula: W = 500 times the sum of (LN divided by N-1) 18+ 12N + 36, where "W" equals overall total weight on any group 19of 2 or more consecutive axles to the nearest 500 pounds, "L" 20equals the distance measured to the nearest foot between 21extremes of any group of 2 or more consecutive axles, and "N" 22equals the number of axles in the group under consideration.23    The above formula when expressed in tabular form results   HB5149- 2 -LRB104 18709 LNS 32152 b1in allowable loads as follows: 2Distance measured 3to the nearest 4foot between the 5extremes of any         Maximum weight in pounds 6group of 2 or           of any group of 7more consecutive        2 or more consecutive axles 8axles9feet2 axles3 axles4 axles5 axles6 axles10434,00011534,00012634,00013734,00014834,000*34,00015Between 8 16and 938,000 42,000 17939,00042,500181040,00043,500191144,000201245,00050,000211345,50050,500221446,50051,500231547,00052,000241648,00052,50058,000251748,50053,50058,500  HB5149- 3 -LRB104 18709 LNS 32152 b11849,50054,00059,00021950,00054,50060,00032051,00055,50060,50066,00042151,50056,00061,00066,50052252,50056,50061,50067,00062353,00057,50062,50068,00072454,00058,00063,00068,50082554,50058,50063,50069,00092655,50059,50064,00069,500102756,00060,00065,00070,000112857,00060,50065,50071,000122957,50061,50066,00071,500133058,50062,00066,50072,000143159,00062,50067,50072,500153260,00063,50068,00073,000163364,00068,50074,000173464,50069,00074,500183565,50070,00075,000193666,000**70,50075,500203766,500**71,00076,000213867,500**72,00077,000223968,00072,50077,500234068,50073,00078,000244169,50073,50078,500254270,00074,00079,000264370,50075,00080,000  HB5149- 4 -LRB104 18709 LNS 32152 b14471,50075,50024572,00076,00034672,50076,50044773,50077,50054874,00078,00064974,50078,50075075,50079,00085176,00080,00095276,500105377,500115478,000125578,500135679,500145780,00015*If the distance between 2 axles is 96 inches or less, the 2 16axles are tandem axles and the maximum total weight may not 17exceed 34,000 pounds, notwithstanding the higher limit 18resulting from the application of the formula.19**Two consecutive sets of tandem axles may carry 34,000 pounds 20each if the overall distance between the first and last axles 21of these tandems is 36 feet or more. 22    Vehicles not in a combination having more than 4 axles may 23not exceed the weight in the table in this subsection (a) for 4 24axles measured between the extreme axles of the vehicle.25    Vehicles in a combination having more than 6 axles may not 26exceed the weight in the table in this subsection (a) for 6   HB5149- 5 -LRB104 18709 LNS 32152 b1axles measured between the extreme axles of the combination.2    Local authorities, with respect to streets and highways 3under their jurisdiction, without additional fees, may also by 4ordinance or resolution allow the weight limitations of this 5subsection, provided the maximum gross weight on any one axle 6shall not exceed 20,000 pounds and the maximum total weight on 7any tandem axle shall not exceed 34,000 pounds, on designated 8highways when appropriate regulatory signs giving notice are 9erected upon the street or highway or portion of any street or 10highway affected by the ordinance or resolution.11    The following are exceptions to the above formula:12        (1) Vehicles for which a different limit is 13    established and posted in accordance with Section 15-316 14    of this Code.15        (2) Vehicles for which the Department of 16    Transportation and local authorities issue overweight 17    permits under authority of Section 15-301 of this Code. 18    These vehicles are not subject to the bridge formula.19        (3) Cities having a population of more than 50,000 may 20    permit by ordinance axle loads on 2-axle motor vehicles 33 21    1/2% above those provided for herein, but the increase 22    shall not become effective until the city has officially 23    notified the Department of the passage of the ordinance 24    and shall not apply to those vehicles when outside of the 25    limits of the city, nor shall the gross weight of any 26    2-axle motor vehicle operating over any street of the city   HB5149- 6 -LRB104 18709 LNS 32152 b1    exceed 40,000 pounds.2        (4) Weight limitations shall not apply to vehicles 3    (including loads) operated by a public utility when 4    transporting equipment required for emergency repair of 5    public utility facilities or properties or water wells.6        (4.5) A 3-axle or 4-axle vehicle (including when 7    laden) operated or hired by a municipality within Cook, 8    Lake, McHenry, Kane, DuPage, or Will county being operated 9    for the purpose of performing emergency sewer repair that 10    would be subject to a weight limitation less than 66,000 11    pounds under the formula in this subsection (a) shall have 12    a weight limitation of 66,000 pounds or the vehicle's 13    gross vehicle weight rating, whichever is less. This 14    paragraph (4.5) does not apply to vehicles being operated 15    on the National System of Interstate and Defense Highways, 16    or to vehicles being operated on bridges or other elevated 17    structures constituting a part of a highway. 18        (5) Two consecutive sets of tandem axles may carry a 19    total weight of 34,000 pounds each if the overall distance 20    between the first and last axles of the consecutive sets 21    of tandem axles is 36 feet or more, notwithstanding the 22    lower limit resulting from the application of the above 23    formula.24        (6) A truck, not in combination and used exclusively 25    for the collection of rendering materials, may, when 26    laden, transmit upon the road surface, except when on part   HB5149- 7 -LRB104 18709 LNS 32152 b1    of the National System of Interstate and Defense Highways, 2    the following maximum weights: 22,000 pounds on a single 3    axle; 40,000 pounds on a tandem axle.4        (7) A truck not in combination, equipped with a self 5    compactor or an industrial roll-off hoist and roll-off 6    container, used exclusively for garbage, refuse, or 7    recycling operations, may, when laden, transmit upon the 8    road surface, except when on part of the National System 9    of Interstate and Defense Highways, the following maximum 10    weights: 22,000 pounds on a single axle; 40,000 pounds on 11    a tandem axle; 40,000 pounds gross weight on a 2-axle 12    vehicle; 54,000 pounds gross weight on a 3-axle vehicle. 13    This vehicle is not subject to the bridge formula.14        (7.5) A 3-axle rear discharge truck mixer registered 15    as a Special Hauling Vehicle, used exclusively for the 16    mixing and transportation of concrete in the plastic 17    state, may, when laden, transmit upon the road surface, 18    except when on part of the National System of Interstate 19    and Defense Highways, the following maximum weights: 20    22,000 pounds on single axle; 40,000 pounds on a tandem 21    axle; 54,000 pounds gross weight on a 3-axle vehicle. This 22    vehicle is not subject to the bridge formula. 23        (8) Except as provided in paragraph (7.5) of this 24    subsection (a), tandem axles on a 3-axle truck registered 25    as a Special Hauling Vehicle, manufactured prior to or in 26    the model year of 2024 and first registered in Illinois   HB5149- 8 -LRB104 18709 LNS 32152 b1    prior to January 1, 2025, with a distance greater than 72 2    inches but not more than 96 inches between any series of 2 3    axles, is allowed a combined weight on the series not to 4    exceed 36,000 pounds and neither axle of the series may 5    exceed 20,000 pounds. Any vehicle of this type 6    manufactured after the model year of 2024 or first 7    registered in Illinois after December 31, 2024 may not 8    exceed a combined weight of 34,000 pounds through the 9    series of 2 axles and neither axle of the series may exceed 10    20,000 pounds.11        A 3-axle combination sewer cleaning jetting vacuum 12    truck registered as a Special Hauling Vehicle, used 13    exclusively for the transportation of non-hazardous solid 14    waste, manufactured before or in the model year of 2014, 15    first registered in Illinois before January 1, 2015, may, 16    when laden, transmit upon the road surface, except when on 17    part of the National System of Interstate and Defense 18    Highways, the following maximum weights: 22,000 pounds on 19    a single axle; 40,000 pounds on a tandem axle; 54,000 20    pounds gross weight on a 3-axle vehicle. This vehicle is 21    not subject to the bridge formula. 22        (9) A 4-axle truck mixer registered as a Special 23    Hauling Vehicle, used exclusively for the mixing and 24    transportation of concrete in the plastic state, and not 25    operated on a highway that is part of the National System 26    of Interstate Highways, is allowed the following maximum   HB5149- 9 -LRB104 18709 LNS 32152 b1    weights: 20,000 pounds on any single axle; 36,000 pounds 2    on a series of axles greater than 72 inches but not more 3    than 96 inches; and 34,000 pounds on any series of 2 axles 4    greater than 40 inches but not more than 72 inches. The 5    gross weight of this vehicle may not exceed the weights 6    allowed by the bridge formula for 4 axles. The bridge 7    formula does not apply to any series of 3 axles while the 8    vehicle is transporting concrete in the plastic state, but 9    no axle or tandem axle of the series may exceed the maximum 10    weight permitted under this paragraph (9) of subsection 11    (a).12        (10) Combinations of vehicles, registered as Special 13    Hauling Vehicles that include a semitrailer manufactured 14    prior to or in the model year of 2024, and registered in 15    Illinois prior to January 1, 2025, having 5 axles with a 16    distance of 42 feet or less between extreme axles, may not 17    exceed the following maximum weights: 20,000 pounds on a 18    single axle; 34,000 pounds on a tandem axle; and 72,000 19    pounds gross weight. This combination of vehicles is not 20    subject to the bridge formula. For all those combinations 21    of vehicles that include a semitrailer manufactured after 22    the effective date of P.A. 92-0417, the overall distance 23    between the first and last axles of the 2 sets of tandems 24    must be 18 feet 6 inches or more. Any combination of 25    vehicles that has had its cargo container replaced in its 26    entirety after December 31, 2024 may not exceed the   HB5149- 10 -LRB104 18709 LNS 32152 b1    weights allowed by the bridge formula.2        (11) The maximum weight allowed on a vehicle with 3    crawler type tracks is 40,000 pounds.4        (12) A combination of vehicles, including a tow truck 5    and a disabled vehicle or disabled combination of 6    vehicles, that exceeds the weight restriction imposed by 7    this Code, may be operated on a public highway in this 8    State provided that neither the disabled vehicle nor any 9    vehicle being towed nor the tow truck itself shall exceed 10    the weight limitations permitted under this Chapter. 11    During the towing operation, neither the tow truck nor the 12    vehicle combination shall exceed 24,000 pounds on a single 13    rear axle and 44,000 pounds on a tandem rear axle, 14    provided the towing vehicle:15            (i) is specifically designed as a tow truck having 16        a gross vehicle weight rating of at least 18,000 17        pounds and is equipped with air brakes, provided that 18        air brakes are required only if the towing vehicle is 19        towing a vehicle, semitrailer, or tractor-trailer 20        combination that is equipped with air brakes;21            (ii) is equipped with flashing, rotating, or 22        oscillating amber lights, visible for at least 500 23        feet in all directions;24            (iii) is capable of utilizing the lighting and 25        braking systems of the disabled vehicle or combination 26        of vehicles; and  HB5149- 11 -LRB104 18709 LNS 32152 b1            (iv) does not engage in a tow exceeding 20 miles 2        from the initial point of wreck or disablement. Any 3        additional movement of the vehicles may occur only 4        upon issuance of authorization for that movement under 5        the provisions of Sections 15-301 through 15-318 of 6        this Code. The towing vehicle, however, may tow any 7        disabled vehicle to a point where repairs are actually 8        to occur. This movement shall be valid only on State 9        routes. The tower must abide by posted bridge weight 10        limits.11        (12.5) The vehicle weight limitations in this Section 12    do not apply to a covered heavy duty tow and recovery 13    vehicle. The covered heavy duty tow and recovery vehicle 14    license plate must cover the operating empty weight of the 15    covered heavy duty tow and recovery vehicle only. 16        (13) Upon and during a declaration of an emergency 17    propane supply disaster by the Governor under Section 7 of 18    the Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act:19            (i) a truck not in combination, equipped with a 20        cargo tank, used exclusively for the transportation of 21        propane or liquefied petroleum gas may, when laden, 22        transmit upon the road surface, except when on part of 23        the National System of Interstate and Defense 24        Highways, the following maximum weights: 22,000 pounds 25        on a single axle; 40,000 pounds on a tandem axle; 26        40,000 pounds gross weight on a 2-axle vehicle; 54,000   HB5149- 12 -LRB104 18709 LNS 32152 b1        pounds gross weight on a 3-axle vehicle; and2            (ii) a truck when in combination with a trailer 3        equipped with a cargo tank used exclusively for the 4        transportation of propane or liquefied petroleum gas 5        may, when laden, transmit upon the road surface, 6        except when on part of the National System of 7        Interstate and Defense Highways, the following maximum 8        weights: 22,000 pounds on a single axle; 40,000 pounds 9        on a tandem axle; 90,000 pounds gross weight on a 10        5-axle or 6-axle vehicle.11        Vehicles operating under this paragraph (13) are not 12    subject to the bridge formula. 13        (14) A vehicle or combination of vehicles that uses 14    natural gas or propane gas as a motor fuel may exceed the 15    above weight limitations by up to 2,000 pounds, the total 16    allowance is calculated by an amount that is equal to the 17    difference between the weight of the vehicle attributable 18    to the natural gas or propane gas tank and fueling system 19    carried by the vehicle, and the weight of a comparable 20    diesel tank and fueling system. This paragraph (14) shall 21    not allow a vehicle to exceed any posted weight limit on a 22    highway or structure. 23        (15) An emergency vehicle or fire apparatus that is a 24    vehicle designed to be used under emergency conditions to 25    transport personnel and equipment, and used to support the 26    suppression of fires and mitigation of other hazardous   HB5149- 13 -LRB104 18709 LNS 32152 b1    situations on a Class I highway, may not exceed 86,000 2    pounds gross weight, or any of the following weight 3    allowances:4            (i) 24,000 pounds on a single steering axle;5            (ii) 33,500 pounds on a single drive axle;6            (iii) 62,000 pounds on a tandem axle; or7            (iv) 52,000 pounds on a tandem rear drive steer 8        axle. 9        (16) A bus, motor coach, or recreational vehicle may 10    carry a total weight of 24,000 pounds on a single axle, but 11    may not exceed other weight provisions of this Section. 12    Gross weight limits shall not apply to the combination of 13the tow truck and vehicles being towed. The tow truck license 14plate must cover the operating empty weight of the tow truck 15only. The weight of each vehicle being towed shall be covered 16by a valid license plate issued to the owner or operator of the 17vehicle being towed and displayed on that vehicle. If no valid 18plate issued to the owner or operator of that vehicle is 19displayed on that vehicle, or the plate displayed on that 20vehicle does not cover the weight of the vehicle, the weight of 21the vehicle shall be covered by the third tow truck plate 22issued to the owner or operator of the tow truck and 23temporarily affixed to the vehicle being towed. If a roll-back 24carrier is registered and being used as a tow truck, however, 25the license plate or plates for the tow truck must cover the 26gross vehicle weight, including any load carried on the bed of   HB5149- 14 -LRB104 18709 LNS 32152 b1the roll-back carrier.2    The Department may by rule or regulation prescribe 3additional requirements. However, nothing in this Code shall 4prohibit a tow truck under instructions of a police officer 5from legally clearing a disabled vehicle, that may be in 6violation of weight limitations of this Chapter, from the 7roadway to the berm or shoulder of the highway. If in the 8opinion of the police officer that location is unsafe, the 9officer is authorized to have the disabled vehicle towed to 10the nearest place of safety.11    For the purpose of this subsection, gross vehicle weight 12rating, or GVWR, means the value specified by the manufacturer 13as the loaded weight of the tow truck.14    (b) As used in this Section, "recycling haul" or 15"recycling operation" means the hauling of non-hazardous, 16non-special, non-putrescible materials, such as paper, glass, 17cans, or plastic, for subsequent use in the secondary 18materials market.19    (c) No vehicle or combination of vehicles equipped with 20pneumatic tires shall be operated, unladen or with load, upon 21the highways of this State in violation of the provisions of 22any permit issued under the provisions of Sections 15-301 23through 15-318 of this Chapter.24    (d) No vehicle or combination of vehicles equipped with 25other than pneumatic tires may be operated, unladen or with 26load, upon the highways of this State when the gross weight on   HB5149- 15 -LRB104 18709 LNS 32152 b1the road surface through any wheel exceeds 800 pounds per inch 2width of tire tread or when the gross weight on the road 3surface through any axle exceeds 16,000 pounds.4    (e) No person shall operate a vehicle or combination of 5vehicles over a bridge or other elevated structure 6constituting part of a highway with a gross weight that is 7greater than the maximum weight permitted by the Department, 8when the structure is sign posted as provided in this Section.9    (f) The Department upon request from any local authority 10shall, or upon its own initiative may, conduct an 11investigation of any bridge or other elevated structure 12constituting a part of a highway, and if it finds that the 13structure cannot with safety to itself withstand the weight of 14vehicles otherwise permissible under this Code the Department 15shall determine and declare the maximum weight of vehicles 16that the structures can withstand, and shall cause or permit 17suitable signs stating maximum weight to be erected and 18maintained before each end of the structure. No person shall 19operate a vehicle or combination of vehicles over any 20structure with a gross weight that is greater than the posted 21maximum weight.22    (g) Upon the trial of any person charged with a violation 23of subsection (e) or (f) of this Section, proof of the 24determination of the maximum allowable weight by the 25Department and the existence of the signs, constitutes 26conclusive evidence of the maximum weight that can be   HB5149- 16 -LRB104 18709 LNS 32152 b1maintained with safety to the bridge or structure.2(Source: P.A. 102-124, eff. 7-23-21.) 3    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-436)4    Sec. 15-111. Wheel and axle loads and gross weights. 5    (a) No vehicle or combination of vehicles with pneumatic 6tires may be operated, unladen or with load, when the total 7weight on the road surface exceeds the following: 20,000 8pounds on a single axle; 34,000 pounds on a tandem axle with no 9axle within the tandem exceeding 20,000 pounds; 80,000 pounds 10gross weight for vehicle combinations of 5 or more axles; or a 11total weight on a group of 2 or more consecutive axles in 12excess of that weight produced by the application of the 13following formula: W = 500 times the sum of (LN divided by N-1) 14+ 12N + 36, where "W" equals overall total weight on any group 15of 2 or more consecutive axles to the nearest 500 pounds, "L" 16equals the distance measured to the nearest foot between 17extremes of any group of 2 or more consecutive axles, and "N" 18equals the number of axles in the group under consideration.19    The above formula when expressed in tabular form results 20in allowable loads as follows: 21Distance measured 22to the nearest 23foot between the 24extremes of any         Maximum weight in pounds HB5149- 17 -LRB104 18709 LNS 32152 b1group of 2 or           of any group of 2more consecutive        2 or more consecutive axles 3axles4feet2 axles3 axles4 axles5 axles6 axles5434,0006534,0007634,0008734,0009834,000*34,00010Between 8 11and 938,000 42,000 12939,00042,500131040,00043,500141144,000151245,00050,000161345,50050,500171446,50051,500181547,00052,000191648,00052,50058,000201748,50053,50058,500211849,50054,00059,000221950,00054,50060,000232051,00055,50060,50066,000242151,50056,00061,00066,500252252,50056,50061,50067,000262353,00057,50062,50068,000  HB5149- 18 -LRB104 18709 LNS 32152 b12454,00058,00063,00068,50022554,50058,50063,50069,00032655,50059,50064,00069,50042756,00060,00065,00070,00052857,00060,50065,50071,00062957,50061,50066,00071,50073058,50062,00066,50072,00083159,00062,50067,50072,50093260,00063,50068,00073,000103364,00068,50074,000113464,50069,00074,500123565,50070,00075,000133666,000**70,50075,500143766,500**71,00076,000153867,500**72,00077,000163968,00072,50077,500174068,50073,00078,000184169,50073,50078,500194270,00074,00079,000204370,50075,00080,000214471,50075,500224572,00076,000234672,50076,500244773,50077,500254874,00078,000264974,50078,500  HB5149- 19 -LRB104 18709 LNS 32152 b15075,50079,00025176,00080,00035276,50045377,50055478,00065578,50075679,50085780,0009*If the distance between 2 axles is 96 inches or less, the 2 10axles are tandem axles and the maximum total weight may not 11exceed 34,000 pounds, notwithstanding the higher limit 12resulting from the application of the formula.13**Two consecutive sets of tandem axles may carry 34,000 pounds 14each if the overall distance between the first and last axles 15of these tandems is 36 feet or more. 16    Vehicles not in a combination having more than 4 axles may 17not exceed the weight in the table in this subsection (a) for 4 18axles measured between the extreme axles of the vehicle.19    Vehicles in a combination having more than 6 axles may not 20exceed the weight in the table in this subsection (a) for 6 21axles measured between the extreme axles of the combination.22    Local authorities, with respect to streets and highways 23under their jurisdiction, without additional fees, may also by 24ordinance or resolution allow the weight limitations of this 25subsection, provided the maximum gross weight on any one axle 26shall not exceed 20,000 pounds and the maximum total weight on   HB5149- 20 -LRB104 18709 LNS 32152 b1any tandem axle shall not exceed 34,000 pounds, on designated 2highways when appropriate regulatory signs giving notice are 3erected upon the street or highway or portion of any street or 4highway affected by the ordinance or resolution.5    The following are exceptions to the above formula:6        (1) Vehicles for which a different limit is 7    established and posted in accordance with Section 15-316 8    of this Code.9        (2) Vehicles for which the Department of 10    Transportation and local authorities issue overweight 11    permits under authority of Section 15-301 of this Code. 12    These vehicles are not subject to the bridge formula.13        (3) Cities having a population of more than 50,000 may 14    permit by ordinance axle loads on 2-axle motor vehicles 33 15    1/2% above those provided for herein, but the increase 16    shall not become effective until the city has officially 17    notified the Department of the passage of the ordinance 18    and shall not apply to those vehicles when outside of the 19    limits of the city, nor shall the gross weight of any 20    2-axle motor vehicle operating over any street of the city 21    exceed 40,000 pounds.22        (4) Weight limitations shall not apply to vehicles 23    (including loads) operated by a public utility when 24    transporting equipment required for emergency repair of 25    public utility facilities or properties or water wells.26        (4.5) A 3-axle or 4-axle vehicle (including when   HB5149- 21 -LRB104 18709 LNS 32152 b1    laden) operated or hired by a municipality within Cook, 2    Lake, McHenry, Kane, DuPage, or Will county being operated 3    for the purpose of performing emergency sewer repair that 4    would be subject to a weight limitation less than 66,000 5    pounds under the formula in this subsection (a) shall have 6    a weight limitation of 66,000 pounds or the vehicle's 7    gross vehicle weight rating, whichever is less. This 8    paragraph (4.5) does not apply to vehicles being operated 9    on the National System of Interstate and Defense Highways, 10    or to vehicles being operated on bridges or other elevated 11    structures constituting a part of a highway. 12        (5) Two consecutive sets of tandem axles may carry a 13    total weight of 34,000 pounds each if the overall distance 14    between the first and last axles of the consecutive sets 15    of tandem axles is 36 feet or more, notwithstanding the 16    lower limit resulting from the application of the above 17    formula.18        (6) A truck, not in combination and used exclusively 19    for the collection of rendering materials, may, when 20    laden, transmit upon the road surface, except when on part 21    of the National System of Interstate and Defense Highways, 22    the following maximum weights: 22,000 pounds on a single 23    axle; 40,000 pounds on a tandem axle.24        (7) A truck not in combination, equipped with a self 25    compactor or an industrial roll-off hoist and roll-off 26    container, used exclusively for garbage, refuse, or   HB5149- 22 -LRB104 18709 LNS 32152 b1    recycling operations, may, when laden, transmit upon the 2    road surface, except when on part of the National System 3    of Interstate and Defense Highways, the following maximum 4    weights: 22,000 pounds on a single axle; 40,000 pounds on 5    a tandem axle; 40,000 pounds gross weight on a 2-axle 6    vehicle; 54,000 pounds gross weight on a 3-axle vehicle. 7    This vehicle is not subject to the bridge formula.8        (7.5) A 3-axle rear discharge truck mixer registered 9    as a Special Hauling Vehicle, used exclusively for the 10    mixing and transportation of concrete in the plastic 11    state, may, when laden, transmit upon the road surface, 12    except when on part of the National System of Interstate 13    and Defense Highways, the following maximum weights: 14    22,000 pounds on single axle; 40,000 pounds on a tandem 15    axle; 54,000 pounds gross weight on a 3-axle vehicle. This 16    vehicle is not subject to the bridge formula. 17        (8) Except as provided in paragraph (7.5) of this 18    subsection (a), tandem axles on a 3-axle truck registered 19    as a Special Hauling Vehicle, manufactured prior to or in 20    the model year of 2034 2024 and first registered in 21    Illinois prior to January 1, 2035 2025, with a distance 22    greater than 72 inches but not more than 96 inches between 23    any series of 2 axles, is allowed a combined weight on the 24    series not to exceed 36,000 pounds and neither axle of the 25    series may exceed 20,000 pounds. Any vehicle of this type 26    manufactured after the model year of 2034 2024 or first   HB5149- 23 -LRB104 18709 LNS 32152 b1    registered in Illinois after December 31, 2035 2024 may 2    not exceed a combined weight of 34,000 pounds through the 3    series of 2 axles and neither axle of the series may exceed 4    20,000 pounds.5        A 3-axle combination sewer cleaning jetting vacuum 6    truck registered as a Special Hauling Vehicle, used 7    exclusively for the transportation of non-hazardous solid 8    waste, manufactured before or in the model year of 2034 9    2014, first registered in Illinois before January 1, 2035 10    2015, may, when laden, transmit upon the road surface, 11    except when on part of the National System of Interstate 12    and Defense Highways, the following maximum weights: 13    22,000 pounds on a single axle; 40,000 pounds on a tandem 14    axle; 54,000 pounds gross weight on a 3-axle vehicle. This 15    vehicle is not subject to the bridge formula. 16        (9) A 4-axle truck mixer registered as a Special 17    Hauling Vehicle, used exclusively for the mixing and 18    transportation of concrete in the plastic state, and not 19    operated on a highway that is part of the National System 20    of Interstate Highways, is allowed the following maximum 21    weights: 20,000 pounds on any single axle; 36,000 pounds 22    on a series of axles greater than 72 inches but not more 23    than 96 inches; and 34,000 pounds on any series of 2 axles 24    greater than 40 inches but not more than 72 inches. The 25    gross weight of this vehicle may not exceed the weights 26    allowed by the bridge formula for 4 axles. The bridge   HB5149- 24 -LRB104 18709 LNS 32152 b1    formula does not apply to any series of 3 axles while the 2    vehicle is transporting concrete in the plastic state, but 3    no axle or tandem axle of the series may exceed the maximum 4    weight permitted under this paragraph (9) of subsection 5    (a).6        (10) Combinations of vehicles, registered as Special 7    Hauling Vehicles that include a semitrailer manufactured 8    prior to or in the model year of 2034 2024, and registered 9    in Illinois prior to January 1, 2035 2025, having 5 axles 10    with a distance of 42 feet or less between extreme axles, 11    may not exceed the following maximum weights: 20,000 12    pounds on a single axle; 34,000 pounds on a tandem axle; 13    and 72,000 pounds gross weight. This combination of 14    vehicles is not subject to the bridge formula. For all 15    those combinations of vehicles that include a semitrailer 16    manufactured after the effective date of P.A. 92-0417, the 17    overall distance between the first and last axles of the 2 18    sets of tandems must be 18 feet 6 inches or more. Any 19    combination of vehicles that has had its cargo container 20    replaced in its entirety after December 31, 2024 may not 21    exceed the weights allowed by the bridge formula.22        (11) The maximum weight allowed on a vehicle with 23    crawler type tracks is 40,000 pounds.24        (12) A combination of vehicles, including a tow truck 25    and a disabled vehicle or disabled combination of 26    vehicles, that exceeds the weight restriction imposed by   HB5149- 25 -LRB104 18709 LNS 32152 b1    this Code, may be operated on a public highway in this 2    State provided that neither the disabled vehicle nor any 3    vehicle being towed nor the tow truck itself shall exceed 4    the weight limitations permitted under this Chapter. 5    During the towing operation, neither the tow truck nor the 6    vehicle combination shall exceed 24,000 pounds on a single 7    rear axle and 44,000 pounds on a tandem rear axle, 8    provided the towing vehicle:9            (i) is specifically designed as a tow truck having 10        a gross vehicle weight rating of at least 18,000 11        pounds and is equipped with air brakes, provided that 12        air brakes are required to be used only if the towing 13        vehicle is towing a vehicle, semitrailer, or 14        tractor-trailer combination that is equipped with air 15        brakes;16            (ii) is equipped with and utilizing flashing, 17        rotating, or oscillating amber lights, visible for at 18        least 500 feet in all directions;19            (iii) is capable of utilizing the lighting and 20        braking systems of the disabled vehicle or combination 21        of vehicles; and22            (iv) does not engage in a tow exceeding 20 miles 23        from the initial point of wreck or disablement. Any 24        additional movement of the vehicles may occur only 25        upon issuance of authorization for that movement under 26        the provisions of Sections 15-301 through 15-318 of   HB5149- 26 -LRB104 18709 LNS 32152 b1        this Code. The towing vehicle, however, may tow any 2        disabled vehicle to a point where repairs are actually 3        to occur. This movement shall be valid only on State 4        routes. The tower must abide by posted bridge weight 5        limits.6        (12.5) The vehicle weight limitations in this Section 7    do not apply to a covered heavy duty tow and recovery 8    vehicle that meet the criteria of subparagraphs (i) 9    through (iii) of paragraph (12). The covered heavy duty 10    tow and recovery vehicle license plate must cover the 11    operating empty weight of the covered heavy duty tow and 12    recovery vehicle only. 13        (13) Upon and during a declaration of an emergency 14    propane supply disaster by the Governor under Section 7 of 15    the Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act:16            (i) a truck not in combination, equipped with a 17        cargo tank, used exclusively for the transportation of 18        propane or liquefied petroleum gas may, when laden, 19        transmit upon the road surface, except when on part of 20        the National System of Interstate and Defense 21        Highways, the following maximum weights: 22,000 pounds 22        on a single axle; 40,000 pounds on a tandem axle; 23        40,000 pounds gross weight on a 2-axle vehicle; 54,000 24        pounds gross weight on a 3-axle vehicle; and25            (ii) a truck when in combination with a trailer 26        equipped with a cargo tank used exclusively for the   HB5149- 27 -LRB104 18709 LNS 32152 b1        transportation of propane or liquefied petroleum gas 2        may, when laden, transmit upon the road surface, 3        except when on part of the National System of 4        Interstate and Defense Highways, the following maximum 5        weights: 22,000 pounds on a single axle; 40,000 pounds 6        on a tandem axle; 90,000 pounds gross weight on a 7        5-axle or 6-axle vehicle.8        Vehicles operating under this paragraph (13) are not 9    subject to the bridge formula. 10        (14) A vehicle or combination of vehicles that uses 11    either natural gas or propane gas as a motor fuel or is 12    operated by an engine fueled wholly or partially by an 13    electric battery or hydrogen fuel cell electric fueling 14    system may exceed the above weight limitations by up to 15    2,000 pounds, the total allowance is calculated by an 16    amount that is equal to the difference between the weight 17    of the vehicle attributable to the natural gas or propane 18    or hydrogen gas tank, batteries, and fueling system 19    carried by the vehicle, and the weight of a comparable 20    diesel tank and fueling system. This paragraph (14) shall 21    not allow a vehicle to exceed any posted weight limit on a 22    highway or structure. 23        (15) An emergency vehicle or fire apparatus that is a 24    vehicle designed to be used under emergency conditions to 25    transport personnel and equipment, and used to support the 26    suppression of fires and mitigation of other hazardous   HB5149- 28 -LRB104 18709 LNS 32152 b1    situations on a Class I highway, may not exceed 86,000 2    pounds gross weight, or any of the following weight 3    allowances:4            (i) 24,000 pounds on a single steering axle;5            (ii) 33,500 pounds on a single drive axle;6            (iii) 62,000 pounds on a tandem axle; or7            (iv) 52,000 pounds on a tandem rear drive steer 8        axle. 9        (16) A bus, motor coach, or recreational vehicle may 10    carry a total weight of 24,000 pounds on a single axle, but 11    may not exceed other weight provisions of this Section. 12    Gross weight limits shall not apply to the combination of 13the tow truck and vehicles being towed. The tow truck license 14plate must cover the operating empty weight of the tow truck 15only. The weight of each vehicle being towed shall be covered 16by a valid license plate issued to the owner or operator of the 17vehicle being towed and displayed on that vehicle. If no valid 18plate issued to the owner or operator of that vehicle is 19displayed on that vehicle, or the plate displayed on that 20vehicle does not cover the weight of the vehicle, the weight of 21the vehicle shall be covered by the third tow truck plate 22issued to the owner or operator of the tow truck and 23temporarily affixed to the vehicle being towed. If a roll-back 24carrier is registered and being used as a tow truck, however, 25the license plate or plates for the tow truck must cover the 26gross vehicle weight, including any load carried on the bed of   HB5149- 29 -LRB104 18709 LNS 32152 b1the roll-back carrier.2    The Department may by rule or regulation prescribe 3additional requirements. However, nothing in this Code shall 4prohibit a tow truck under instructions of a police officer 5from legally clearing a disabled vehicle, that may be in 6violation of weight limitations of this Chapter, from the 7roadway to the berm or shoulder of the highway. If in the 8opinion of the police officer that location is unsafe, the 9officer is authorized to have the disabled vehicle towed to 10the nearest place of safety.11    For the purpose of this subsection, gross vehicle weight 12rating, or GVWR, means the value specified by the manufacturer 13as the loaded weight of the tow truck.14    (b) As used in this Section, "recycling haul" or 15"recycling operation" means the hauling of non-hazardous, 16non-special, non-putrescible materials, such as paper, glass, 17cans, or plastic, for subsequent use in the secondary 18materials market.19    (c) No vehicle or combination of vehicles equipped with 20pneumatic tires shall be operated, unladen or with load, upon 21the highways of this State in violation of the provisions of 22any permit issued under the provisions of Sections 15-301 23through 15-318 of this Chapter.24    (d) No vehicle or combination of vehicles equipped with 25other than pneumatic tires may be operated, unladen or with 26load, upon the highways of this State when the gross weight on   HB5149- 30 -LRB104 18709 LNS 32152 b1the road surface through any wheel exceeds 800 pounds per inch 2width of tire tread or when the gross weight on the road 3surface through any axle exceeds 16,000 pounds.4    (e) No person shall operate a vehicle or combination of 5vehicles over a bridge or other elevated structure 6constituting part of a highway with a gross weight that is 7greater than the maximum gross weight permitted by the 8Department, when the structure is sign posted as provided in 9this Section.10    (f) The Department upon request from any local authority 11shall, or upon its own initiative may, conduct an 12investigation of any bridge or other elevated structure 13constituting a part of a highway, and if it finds that the 14structure cannot with safety to itself withstand the weight of 15vehicles otherwise permissible under this Code the Department 16shall determine and declare the maximum gross weight of 17vehicles that the structures can withstand, and shall cause or 18permit suitable signs stating maximum gross weight to be 19erected and maintained before each end of the structure. No 20person shall operate a vehicle or combination of vehicles over 21any structure with a gross weight that is greater than the 22posted maximum weight.23    (g) Upon the trial of any person charged with a violation 24of subsection (e) or (f) of this Section, proof of the 25determination of the maximum allowable gross weight by the 26Department and the existence of the signs, constitutes   HB5149- 31 -LRB104 18709 LNS 32152 b1conclusive evidence of the maximum gross weight that can be 2maintained with safety to the bridge or structure.3(Source: P.A. 104-436, eff. 6-1-26.) 4    (625 ILCS 5/15-301)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 15-301)5    Sec. 15-301. Permits for excess size and weight. 6    (a) The Department with respect to highways under its 7jurisdiction and local authorities with respect to highways 8under their jurisdiction may, in their discretion, upon 9application and good cause being shown therefor, issue a 10special permit authorizing the applicant to operate or move a 11vehicle or combination of vehicles of a size or weight of 12vehicle or load exceeding the maximum specified in this Code 13or otherwise not in conformity with this Code upon any highway 14under the jurisdiction of the party granting such permit and 15for the maintenance of which the party is responsible. 16Applications and permits other than those in written or 17printed form may only be accepted from and issued to the 18company or individual making the movement. Except for an 19application to move directly across a highway, it shall be the 20duty of the applicant to establish in the application that the 21load to be moved by such vehicle or combination cannot 22reasonably be dismantled or disassembled, the reasonableness 23of which shall be determined by the Secretary of the 24Department. For the purpose of over length movements, more 25than one object may be carried side by side as long as the   HB5149- 32 -LRB104 18709 LNS 32152 b1height, width, and weight laws are not exceeded and the cause 2for the over length is not due to multiple objects. For the 3purpose of over height movements, more than one object may be 4carried as long as the cause for the over height is not due to 5multiple objects and the length, width, and weight laws are 6not exceeded. For the purpose of an over width movement, more 7than one object may be carried as long as the cause for the 8over width is not due to multiple objects and length, height, 9and weight laws are not exceeded. Except for transporting 10fluid milk products, no State or local agency shall authorize 11the issuance of excess size or weight permits for vehicles and 12loads that are divisible and that can be carried, when 13divided, within the existing size or weight maximums specified 14in this Chapter. Any excess size or weight permit issued in 15violation of the provisions of this Section shall be void at 16issue and any movement made thereunder shall not be authorized 17under the terms of the void permit. In any prosecution for a 18violation of this Chapter when the authorization of an excess 19size or weight permit is at issue, it is the burden of the 20defendant to establish that the permit was valid because the 21load to be moved could not reasonably be dismantled or 22disassembled, or was otherwise nondivisible.23    (a-1) As used in this Section, "extreme heavy duty tow and 24recovery vehicle" means a tow truck manufactured as a unit 25having a lifting capacity of not less than 50 tons, and having 26either 4 axles and an unladen weight of not more than 80,000   HB5149- 33 -LRB104 18709 LNS 32152 b1pounds or 5 axles and an unladen weight not more than 90,000 2pounds. Notwithstanding otherwise applicable gross and axle 3weight limits, an extreme heavy duty tow and recovery vehicle 4may lawfully travel to and from the scene of a disablement and 5clear a disabled vehicle if the towing service has obtained an 6extreme heavy duty tow and recovery permit for the vehicle. 7The form and content of the permit shall be determined by the 8Department with respect to highways under its jurisdiction and 9by local authorities with respect to highways under their 10jurisdiction. For purposes of this Section, clearing a vehicle 11does not include towing the vehicle from the scene of 12disablement. 13    (b) The application for any such permit shall: (1) state 14whether such permit is requested for a single trip or for 15limited continuous operation; (2) (blank); (3) specifically 16describe and identify the vehicle or vehicles and load to be 17operated or moved; (4) state the routing requested, including 18the points of origin and destination, and may identify and 19include a request for routing to the nearest certified scale 20in accordance with the Department's rules and regulations, 21provided the applicant has approval to travel on local roads; 22and (5) (blank).23    (c) The Department or local authority when not 24inconsistent with traffic safety is authorized to issue or 25withhold such permit at its discretion; or, if such permit is 26issued at its discretion to prescribe the route or routes to be   HB5149- 34 -LRB104 18709 LNS 32152 b1traveled, to limit the number of trips, to establish seasonal 2or other time limitations within which the vehicles described 3may be operated on the highways indicated, or otherwise to 4limit or prescribe conditions of operations of such vehicle or 5vehicles, when necessary to assure against undue damage to the 6road foundations, surfaces or structures, and may require such 7undertaking or other security as may be deemed necessary to 8compensate for any injury to any roadway or road structure. 9The Department shall maintain a daily record of each permit 10issued along with the fee and the stipulated dimensions, 11weights, conditions, and restrictions authorized and this 12record shall be presumed correct in any case of questions or 13dispute. The Department shall install an automatic device for 14recording telephone conversations involving permit 15applications. The Department and applicant waive all 16objections to the recording of the conversation.17    (d) The Department shall, upon application in writing from 18any local authority, issue an annual permit authorizing the 19local authority to move oversize highway construction, 20transportation, utility, and maintenance equipment over roads 21under the jurisdiction of the Department. The permit shall be 22applicable only to equipment and vehicles owned by or 23registered in the name of the local authority, and no fee shall 24be charged for the issuance of such permits.25    (e) As an exception to subsection (a) of this Section, the 26Department and local authorities, with respect to highways   HB5149- 35 -LRB104 18709 LNS 32152 b1under their respective jurisdictions, in their discretion and 2upon application in writing, may issue a special permit for 3limited continuous operation, authorizing the applicant to 4move loads of agricultural commodities on a 2-axle single 5vehicle registered by the Secretary of State with axle loads 6not to exceed 35%, on a 3-axle or 4-axle vehicle registered by 7the Secretary of State with axle loads not to exceed 20%, and 8on a 5-axle vehicle registered by the Secretary of State not to 9exceed 10% above those provided in Section 15-111. The total 10gross weight of the vehicle, however, may not exceed the 11maximum gross weight of the registration class of the vehicle 12allowed under Section 3-815 or 3-818 of this Code.13    As used in this Section, "agricultural commodities" means:14        (1) cultivated plants or agricultural produce grown, 15    including, but not limited to, corn, soybeans, wheat, 16    oats, grain sorghum, canola, and rice;17        (2) livestock, including, but not limited to, hogs, 18    equine, sheep, and poultry;19        (3) ensilage; and20        (4) fruits and vegetables. 21    Permits may be issued for a period not to exceed 40 days 22and moves may be made of a distance not to exceed 50 miles from 23a field, an on-farm grain storage facility, a warehouse as 24defined in the Grain Code, or a livestock management facility 25as defined in the Livestock Management Facilities Act over any 26highway except the National System of Interstate and Defense   HB5149- 36 -LRB104 18709 LNS 32152 b1Highways. The operator of the vehicle, however, must abide by 2posted bridge and posted highway weight limits. All implements 3of husbandry operating under this Section between sunset and 4sunrise shall be equipped as prescribed in Section 12-205.1. 5    (e-1) A special permit shall be issued by the Department 6under this Section and shall be required from September 1 7through December 31 for a vehicle that exceeds the maximum 8axle weight and gross weight limits under Section 15-111 of 9this Code or exceeds the vehicle's registered gross weight, 10provided that the vehicle's axle weight and gross weight do 11not exceed 10% above the maximum limits under Section 15-111 12of this Code and does not exceed the vehicle's registered 13gross weight by 10%. All other restrictions that apply to 14permits issued under this Section shall apply during the 15declared time period and no fee shall be charged for the 16issuance of those permits. Permits issued by the Department 17under this subsection (e-1) are only valid on federal and 18State highways under the jurisdiction of the Department, 19except interstate highways. With respect to highways under the 20jurisdiction of local authorities, the local authorities may, 21at their discretion, waive special permit requirements and set 22a divisible load weight limit not to exceed 10% above a 23vehicle's registered gross weight, provided that the vehicle's 24axle weight and gross weight do not exceed 10% above the 25maximum limits specified in Section 15-111. Permits issued 26under this subsection (e-1) shall apply to all registered   HB5149- 37 -LRB104 18709 LNS 32152 b1vehicles eligible to obtain permits under this Section, 2including vehicles used in private or for-hire movement of 3divisible load agricultural commodities during the declared 4time period.5    (f) The form and content of the permit shall be determined 6by the Department with respect to highways under its 7jurisdiction and by local authorities with respect to highways 8under their jurisdiction. Every permit shall be in written 9form and carried in the vehicle or combination of vehicles to 10which it refers and shall be open to inspection by any police 11officer or authorized agent of any authority granting the 12permit and no person shall violate any of the terms or 13conditions of such special permit. Violation of the terms and 14conditions of the permit shall not be deemed a revocation of 15the permit; however, any vehicle and load found to be off the 16route prescribed in the permit shall be held to be operating 17without a permit. Any off-route vehicle and load shall be 18required to obtain a new permit or permits, as necessary, to 19authorize the movement back onto the original permit routing. 20No rule or regulation, nor anything herein, shall be construed 21to authorize any police officer, court, or authorized agent of 22any authority granting the permit to remove the permit from 23the possession of the permittee unless the permittee is 24charged with a fraudulent permit violation as provided in 25subsection (i). However, upon arrest for an offense of 26violation of permit, operating without a permit when the   HB5149- 38 -LRB104 18709 LNS 32152 b1vehicle is off route, or any size or weight offense under this 2Chapter when the permittee plans to raise the issuance of the 3permit as a defense, the permittee, or his agent, must produce 4the permit at any court hearing concerning the alleged 5offense.6    If the permit designates and includes a routing to a 7certified scale, the permittee, while en route to the 8designated scale, shall be deemed in compliance with the 9weight provisions of the permit provided the axle or gross 10weights do not exceed any of the permitted limits by more than 11the following amounts:12        Single axle                2000 pounds 13        Tandem axle                3000 pounds 14        Gross                      5000 pounds15    (g) The Department is authorized to adopt, amend, and make 16available to interested persons a policy concerning reasonable 17rules, limitations and conditions, or provisions of operation 18upon highways under its jurisdiction in addition to those 19contained in this Section for the movement by special permit 20of vehicles, combinations, or loads which cannot reasonably be 21dismantled or disassembled, including manufactured and modular 22home sections and portions thereof. All rules, limitations and 23conditions, or provisions adopted in the policy shall have due 24regard for the safety of the traveling public and the 25protection of the highway system and shall have been 26promulgated in conformity with the provisions of the Illinois   HB5149- 39 -LRB104 18709 LNS 32152 b1Administrative Procedure Act. The requirements of the policy 2for flagmen and escort vehicles shall be the same for all moves 3of comparable size and weight. When escort vehicles are 4required, they shall meet the following requirements:5        (1) All operators shall be 18 years of age or over and 6    properly licensed to operate the vehicle.7        (2) Vehicles escorting oversize oversized loads more 8    than 12 feet wide must be equipped with a rotating or 9    flashing amber light mounted on top as specified under 10    Section 12-215.11    The Department shall establish reasonable rules and 12regulations regarding liability insurance or self insurance 13for vehicles with oversize oversized loads promulgated under 14the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act. Police vehicles may 15be required for escort under circumstances as required by 16rules and regulations of the Department.17    (h) Violation of any rule, limitation or condition, or 18provision of any permit issued in accordance with the 19provisions of this Section shall not render the entire permit 20null and void but the violator shall be deemed guilty of 21violation of permit and guilty of exceeding any size, weight, 22or load limitations in excess of those authorized by the 23permit. The prescribed route or routes on the permit are not 24mere rules, limitations, conditions, or provisions of the 25permit, but are also the sole extent of the authorization 26granted by the permit. If a vehicle and load are found to be   HB5149- 40 -LRB104 18709 LNS 32152 b1off the route or routes prescribed by any permit authorizing 2movement, the vehicle and load are operating without a permit. 3Any off-route movement shall be subject to the size and weight 4maximums, under the applicable provisions of this Chapter, as 5determined by the type or class highway upon which the vehicle 6and load are being operated.7    (i) Whenever any vehicle is operated or movement made 8under a fraudulent permit, the permit shall be void, and the 9person, firm, or corporation to whom such permit was granted, 10the driver of such vehicle in addition to the person who issued 11such permit and any accessory, shall be guilty of fraud and 12either one or all persons may be prosecuted for such 13violation. Any person, firm, or corporation committing such 14violation shall be guilty of a Class 4 felony and the 15Department shall not issue permits to the person, firm, or 16corporation convicted of such violation for a period of one 17year after the date of conviction. Penalties for violations of 18this Section shall be in addition to any penalties imposed for 19violation of other Sections of this Code.20    (j) Whenever any vehicle is operated or movement made in 21violation of a permit issued in accordance with this Section, 22the person to whom such permit was granted, or the driver of 23such vehicle, is guilty of such violation and either, but not 24both, persons may be prosecuted for such violation as stated 25in this subsection (j). Any person, firm, or corporation 26convicted of such violation shall be guilty of a petty offense   HB5149- 41 -LRB104 18709 LNS 32152 b1and shall be fined, for the first offense, not less than $50 2nor more than $200 and, for the second offense by the same 3person, firm, or corporation within a period of one year, not 4less than $200 nor more than $300 and, for the third offense by 5the same person, firm, or corporation within a period of one 6year after the date of the first offense, not less than $300 7nor more than $500 and the Department may, in its discretion, 8not issue permits to the person, firm, or corporation 9convicted of a third offense during a period of one year after 10the date of conviction or supervision for such third offense. 11If any violation is the cause or contributing cause in a motor 12vehicle crash causing damage to property, injury, or death to 13a person, the Department may, in its discretion, not issue a 14permit to the person, firm, or corporation for a period of one 15year after the date of conviction or supervision for the 16offense.17    (k) Whenever any vehicle is operated on local roads under 18permits for excess width or length issued by local 19authorities, such vehicle may be moved upon a State highway 20for a distance not to exceed one-half mile without a permit for 21the purpose of crossing the State highway.22    (l) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, 23the Department, with respect to highways under its 24jurisdiction, and local authorities, with respect to highways 25under their jurisdiction, may at their discretion authorize 26the movement of a vehicle in violation of any size or weight   HB5149- 42 -LRB104 18709 LNS 32152 b1requirement, or both, that would not ordinarily be eligible 2for a permit, when there is a showing of extreme necessity that 3the vehicle and load should be moved without unnecessary 4delay.5    For the purpose of this subsection, showing of extreme 6necessity shall be limited to the following: shipments of 7livestock, hazardous materials, liquid concrete being hauled 8in a mobile cement mixer, or hot asphalt.9    (m) Penalties for violations of this Section shall be in 10addition to any penalties imposed for violating any other 11Section of this Code.12    (n) The Department with respect to highways under its 13jurisdiction and local authorities with respect to highways 14under their jurisdiction, in their discretion and upon 15application in writing, may issue a special permit for 16continuous limited operation, authorizing the applicant to 17operate a tow truck that exceeds the weight limits provided 18for in subsection (a) of Section 15-111, provided:19        (1) no rear single axle of the tow truck exceeds 20    26,000 pounds;21        (2) no rear tandem axle of the tow truck exceeds 22    50,000 pounds;23        (2.1) no triple rear axle on a manufactured recovery 24    unit exceeds 60,000 pounds;25        (3) neither the disabled vehicle nor the disabled 26    combination of vehicles exceed the weight restrictions   HB5149- 43 -LRB104 18709 LNS 32152 b1    imposed by this Chapter 15, or the weight limits imposed 2    under a permit issued by the Department prior to hookup;3        (4) the tow truck prior to hookup does not exceed the 4    weight restrictions imposed by this Chapter 15;5        (5) during the tow operation the tow truck does not 6    violate any weight restriction sign;7        (6) the tow truck is equipped with and utilizing 8    flashing, rotating, or oscillating amber lights, visible 9    for at least 500 feet in all directions;10        (7) the tow truck is specifically designed and 11    licensed as a tow truck;12        (8) the tow truck has a gross vehicle weight rating of 13    sufficient capacity to safely handle the load;14        (9) the tow truck is equipped with air brakes;15        (10) the tow truck is capable of and utilizing the 16    lighting and braking systems of the disabled vehicle or 17    combination of vehicles;18        (11) the tow commences at the initial point of wreck 19    or disablement and terminates at a point where the repairs 20    are actually to occur;21        (12) the permit issued to the tow truck is carried in 22    the tow truck and exhibited on demand by a police officer; 23    and24        (13) the movement shall be valid only on State routes 25    approved by the Department.26    Any excess size or weight movement conducted under a   HB5149- 44 -LRB104 18709 LNS 32152 b1permit issued under this subsection that does not meet the 2requirements of paragraphs (1) through (13) shall be 3considered void and movement unpermitted. 4    (o) (Blank).5    (p) In determining whether a load may be reasonably 6dismantled or disassembled for the purpose of subsection (a), 7the Department shall consider whether there is a significant 8negative impact on the condition of the pavement and 9structures along the proposed route, whether the load or 10vehicle as proposed causes a safety hazard to the traveling 11public, whether dismantling or disassembling the load promotes 12or stifles economic development, and whether the proposed 13route travels less than 5 miles. A load is not required to be 14dismantled or disassembled for the purposes of subsection (a) 15if the Secretary of the Department determines there will be no 16significant negative impact to pavement or structures along 17the proposed route, the proposed load or vehicle causes no 18safety hazard to the traveling public, dismantling or 19disassembling the load does not promote economic development, 20and the proposed route travels less than 5 miles. The 21Department may promulgate rules for the purpose of 22establishing the divisibility of a load pursuant to subsection 23(a). Any load determined by the Secretary to be nondivisible 24shall otherwise comply with the existing size or weight 25maximums specified in this Chapter. 26(Source: P.A. 101-81, eff. 7-12-19; 101-547, eff. 1-1-20;   HB5149- 45 -LRB104 18709 LNS 32152 b1102-124, eff. 7-23-21; 102-982, eff. 7-1-23; revised 6-27-25.) 2    (625 ILCS 5/15-316)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 15-316)3    Sec. 15-316. When the Department or local authority may 4restrict right to use highways. 5    (a) Except as provided in subsection (g), local 6authorities with respect to highways under their jurisdiction 7may by ordinance or resolution prohibit the operation of 8vehicles upon any such highway or impose restrictions as to 9the weight of vehicles to be operated upon any such highway, 10for a total period of not to exceed 90 days, measured in either 11consecutive or nonconsecutive days at the discretion of local 12authorities, in any one calendar year, whenever any said 13highway by reason of deterioration, rain, snow, or other 14climate conditions will be seriously damaged or destroyed 15unless the use of vehicles thereon is prohibited or the 16permissible weights thereof reduced.17    (b) The local authority enacting any such ordinance or 18resolution shall erect or cause to be erected and maintained 19signs designating the provision of the ordinance or resolution 20at each end of that portion of any highway affected thereby, 21and the ordinance or resolution shall not be effective unless 22and until such signs are erected and maintained. To be 23effective, an ordinance or resolution passed to designate a 24Class II roadway need not require that signs be erected, but 25the designation shall be reported to the Department.   HB5149- 46 -LRB104 18709 LNS 32152 b1    (c) Local authorities with respect to highways under their 2jurisdiction may also, by ordinance or resolution, prohibit 3the operation of trucks or other commercial vehicles, or may 4impose limitations as the weight thereof, on designated 5highways under their jurisdiction, which prohibitions and 6limitations shall be designated by appropriate signs placed on 7such highways.8    (c-1) (Blank).9    (c-5) Highway commissioners, with respect to roads under 10their authority, may not permanently post a road or portion 11thereof at a reduced weight limit unless the decision to do so 12is made in accordance with Section 6-201.22 of the Illinois 13Highway Code. 14    (d) The Department shall likewise have authority as 15hereinbefore granted to local authorities to determine by 16resolution and to impose restrictions as to the weight of 17vehicles operated upon any highway under the jurisdiction of 18said department, and such restrictions shall be effective when 19signs giving notice thereof are erected upon the highway or 20portion of any highway affected by such resolution.21    (d-1) (Blank).22    (d-2) (Blank).23    (e) When any vehicle is operated in violation of this 24Section, the owner or driver of the vehicle shall be deemed 25guilty of a violation and either the owner or the driver of the 26vehicle may be prosecuted for the violation. Any person, firm,   HB5149- 47 -LRB104 18709 LNS 32152 b1or corporation convicted of violating this Section shall be 2fined $50 for any weight exceeding the posted weight limit up 3to the axle or gross weight limit allowed a vehicle as provided 4for in subsections (a) or (b) of Section 15-111 and $150 $75 5per every 500 pounds or fraction thereof for any weight 6exceeding that which is provided for in subsections (a) or (b) 7of Section 15-111.8    (f) A municipality is authorized to enforce a county 9weight limit ordinance applying to county highways within its 10corporate limits and is entitled to the proceeds of any fines 11collected from the enforcement.12    (g) An ordinance or resolution enacted by a county or 13township pursuant to subsection (a) of this Section shall not 14apply to cargo tank vehicles with two or three permanent axles 15when delivering propane for emergency heating purposes if the 16cargo tank is loaded at no more than 50 percent capacity, the 17gross vehicle weight of the vehicle does not exceed 32,000 18pounds, and the driver of the cargo tank vehicle notifies the 19appropriate agency or agencies with jurisdiction over the 20highway before driving the vehicle on the highway pursuant to 21this subsection. The cargo tank vehicle must have an operating 22gauge on the cargo tank which indicates the amount of propane 23as a percent of capacity of the cargo tank. The cargo tank must 24have the capacity displayed on the cargo tank, or 25documentation of the capacity of the cargo tank must be 26available in the vehicle. For the purposes of this subsection,   HB5149- 48 -LRB104 18709 LNS 32152 b1propane weighs 4.2 pounds per gallon. This subsection does not 2apply to municipalities. Nothing in this subsection shall 3allow cargo tank vehicles to cross bridges with posted weight 4restrictions if the vehicle exceeds the posted weight limit. 5(Source: P.A. 101-328, eff. 1-1-20.) 6    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 7changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 8that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 9represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 10not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 11made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 12Public Act.